Alabama, session 2026rs, HB567.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. (a) This section shall be known and may be
cited as the Student Athlete Eligibility and Career Transition
Act.
(b) The Legislature finds and declares all of the
following:
(1) Due to the evolving rules and regulations in
collegiate athletics, including the National College Athletic
Association (NCAA) transfer portal and national recruitment
standards, students in this state require earlier and more
intentional academic and athletic planning.
(2) NCAA initial eligibility requirements are uniform
across all sports and genders, and a structured approach
beginning in the ninth grade is necessary to ensure all
student athletes have the opportunity to qualify.
(3) Early eligibility tracking will enable students to
make informed decisions their junior and senior years
regarding college, military service, or workforce entry.
(4) Providing exposure to various postsecondary paths
and transition plans will increase readiness and allow local
industries to recruit disciplined and prepared talent directly
Page 2

industries to recruit disciplined and prepared talent directly
HB567 INTRODUCED
from high schools.
(c) For the purposes of this section, the following
terms have the following meanings:
(1) NCAA ELIGIBILITY TRACKING. The process of
monitoring a student's academic progress, coursework, and
athletic participation in alignment with NCAA Division I and
II initial eligibility standards.
(2) TRANSITION PLAN. A structured postsecondary pathway
plan developed with input from students, parents, and
counselors, focusing on one or more of the following: college
enrollment, military enlistment, or workforce entry.
(d)(1) Beginning with the 2026–2027 school year, all
public high schools in the State of Alabama shall:
a. Implement NCAA eligibility tracking for all students
beginning in the ninth grade;
b. Designate a staff member, such as a guidance
counselor or athletic director, to oversee and report on NCAA
tracking progress for each student athlete;
c. Provide annual updates to student athletes and their
families on NCAA eligibility status beginning at the end of
ninth grade;
d. Develop and implement individualized transition
plans for all students by the beginning of their eleventh
grade year, with the goal of identifying postsecondary goals
and required steps to achieve them; and
e. Offer exposure opportunities, such as career fairs,
military information sessions, and college readiness
workshops, to inform students of available paths and career
Page 3

workshops, to inform students of available paths and career
HB567 INTRODUCED
opportunities.
(2) Schools may collaborate with local employers,
military recruiters, community colleges, and universities to
enhance transition planning and recruiting pipelines.
(e)(1) The State Department of Education shall develop
implementation guidelines and provide training resources to
assist schools in complying with the requirements of this
section.
(2) The department shall monitor compliance, collect
annual data on student eligibility tracking, and report
outcomes to the State Board of Education and the Chairs of the
Senate Education Policy Committee and the House Education
Policy Committee on or before December 31, 2027, and annually
thereafter.
Section 2. This act shall become effective on July 1,
100 2026.
Page 4